Nebraska, session 109, LB257.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 38-2125, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
38-2125 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this
section, the The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a
license based on licensure in another jurisdiction to an individual who:
(a) Meets the licensure requirements of the Mental Health Practice Act or
substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the
recommendation of the board; or
(b) Has been in active practice in the appropriate discipline for at least
five years following initial licensure or certification in another jurisdiction
and has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.
(2) The department may issue a license based on a privilege to practice in
Nebraska under the Licensed Professional Counselors Interstate Compact as
provided in section 5 of such compact.
(3) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall, based on
licensure in another jurisdiction, issue a mental health practitioner license
or an independent mental health practitioner license to a marriage and family
therapist who:
(a) Has a valid, independent, and unrestricted license as a marriage and
family therapist in another state or territory that is in good standing with
such state or territory;
(b) Completes an application and pays all applicable fees; and
(c) Has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.
(4) (3) An applicant for a license who is a military spouse may apply for
a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.
Sec. 2. Section 38-2130, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2130 (1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may
issue a certificate based on licensure in another jurisdiction to represent
oneself as a certified marriage and family therapist, a certified professional
counselor, a social worker, or a certified art therapist to an individual who
meets the requirements of the Mental Health Practice Act relating to marriage
and family therapy, professional counseling, social work, or art therapy, as
appropriate, or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the
department, with the recommendation of the board.
(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall issue a
certificate to a marriage and family therapist based on licensure in another
jurisdiction to an individual who:
(a) Has a valid, independent, and unrestricted license as a marriage and
family therapist in another state or territory that is in good standing with
such state or territory;
(b) Completes an application and pays all applicable fees; and
(c) Has passed the Nebraska jurisprudence examination.
(3) An applicant for a certificate who is a military spouse may apply for
a temporary certificate as provided in section 38-129.01.
Sec. 3. Section 38-2501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2501 Sections 38-2501 to 38-2531 and sections 20 to 23 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Occupational Therapy Practice Act.
Sec. 4. Section 38-2503, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2503 For purposes of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act and
elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise
requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2504 to 38-2514 and sections 20
to 23 of this act apply.
Sec. 5. Section 38-2506, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2506 Deep thermal agent modalities means therapeutic ultrasound, and
phonophoresis, and other commercially available technologies. Deep thermal
agent modalities does not include the use of diathermy or lasers.
-1-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
Sec. 6. Section 38-2507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2507 Electrotherapeutic agent modalities means the use of
electrotherapeutic currents and waveforms to (1) facilitate physiologic changes
in tissues to increase circulation, facilitate tissue healing, and modulate
pain, including, but not limited to, high-voltage galvanic stimulation for
tissue and wound repair and high-voltage pulsed current, and (2) facilitate
neuromuscular or sensory activity to improve muscle strength, reeducate muscle
function, or modulate pain response, including, but not limited to,
neuromuscular electrical stimulation, functional electrical stimulation,
transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation, and interferential current.
neuromuscular electrical stimulation, transcutaneous electrical nerve
stimulation, and iontophoresis. Electrotherapeutic agent modalities does not
include the use of ultraviolet light.
Sec. 7. Section 38-2510, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2510 (1) Practice of occupational therapy means the therapeutic use of
everyday life occupations with persons, groups, or populations to support
occupational performance and participation. Occupational therapy practice
includes clinical reasoning and professional judgment to evaluate, analyze, and
diagnose occupational challenges and provide occupation-based interventions.
Occupational therapy services include habilitation, rehabilitation, and the
promotion of physical and mental health and wellness for clients with all
levels of ability-related needs. These services are provided to a client who
has, or is at risk for, developing an illness, injury, disease, disorder,
condition, impairment, disability, activity limitation, or participation
restriction. Through the provision of skilled services and engagement in
everyday activities, occupational therapy promotes physical and mental health
and well-being by supporting occupational performance in a person with, or at
risk of experiencing, a range of developmental, physical, and mental health
disorders.
(2) The practice of occupational therapy includes the following
components:
(a) Evaluation of factors affecting activities of daily living,
instrumental activities of daily living, health management, rest and sleep,
education, work, play, leisure, and social participation, and includes
environmental and personal factors and occupational and activity demands that
affect performance;
(b) Performance patterns, including habits, routines, roles, and rituals;
(c) Performance skills, including motor skills, process skills, and social
interaction skills;
(d) Client factors, including body functions and structures, values, and
spirituality;
(e) Methods or approaches to identify and select intervention, including
(i) establishment, remediation, or restoration of a skill or ability that has
not yet developed, is impaired, or is in decline, (ii) compensation,
modification, or adaptation of occupations, activities, and contexts to improve
or enhance performance, (iii) maintenance of capabilities to prevent decline in
performance of everyday life occupations, (iv) health promotion and wellness to
enable or enhance performance of everyday life activities and quality of life,
and (v) prevention of occurrence or emergence of barriers to performance and
participation, including injury and disability prevention; and
(f) Interventions and procedures to promote or enhance safety and
performance in activities of daily living, independent activities of daily
living, health management, rest and sleep, education, work, play, leisure, and
social participation, and includes:
(i) Therapeutic use of occupations and activities;
(ii) Training in self-care, self-management, health management, home
management, community and work integration, school activities, and work
performance;
(iii) Identification, development, remediation, or compensation of
physical, neuromusculoskeletal, sensory–perceptual, emotional regulation,
visual, and mental and cognitive functions, pain tolerance and management,
praxis, developmental skills, and behavioral skills;
(iv) Education and training of persons, including family members,
caregivers, groups, and populations;
(v) Care coordination, case management, and transition services;
(vi) Consultation services to persons, groups, populations, programs,
organizations, and communities;
(vii) Virtual interventions;
(viii) Modification of contexts and adaptation of processes, including the
application of ergonomic principles;
(ix) Assessment, design, fabrication, application, fitting, and training
in seating and positioning, assistive technology, adaptive devices, and
orthotic devices, and training in the use of prosthetic devices;
(x) Assessment, recommendation, and training in techniques to enhance
functional mobility, including fitting and management of wheelchairs and other
mobility devices;
(xi) Exercises, including tasks and methods to increase motion, strength,
and endurance for occupational participation;
(xii) Remediation of, and compensation for, visual deficits, including low
vision rehabilitation;
(xiii) Driver rehabilitation and community mobility;
-2-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
(xiv) Management of feeding, eating, and swallowing to enable eating and
feeding performance;
(xv) Application of physical agent, instrument-assisted, and mechanical
modalities and the use of a range of specific therapeutic procedures and
techniques to enhance sensory, motor, perceptual, and cognitive processing, and
manual therapy techniques to enhance performance skills;
(xvi) Facilitating the occupational participation of persons, groups, or
populations through modification of contexts and adaptation of processes;
(xvii) Efforts directed toward promoting occupational justice and
empowering clients to seek and obtain resources to fully participate in
everyday life occupations;
(xviii) Group interventions; and
(xix) Addressing wound care.
(1) Occupational therapy means the use of purposeful activity with
individuals who are limited by physical injury or illness, psychosocial
dysfunction, developmental or learning disabilities, or the aging process in
order to maximize independent function, prevent further disability, and achieve
and maintain health and productivity.
(2) Occupational therapy encompasses evaluation, treatment, and
consultation and may include (a) remediation or restoration of performance
abilities that are limited due to impairment in biological, physiological,
psychological, or neurological processes, (b) adaptation of task, process, or
the environment, or the teaching of compensatory techniques, in order to
enhance performance, (c) disability prevention methods and techniques which
facilitate the development or safe application of performance skills, and (d)
health promotion strategies and practices which enhance performance abilities.
(3) Occupational therapy does not include the use of joint manipulation,
grade five mobilization or manipulation, thrust joint manipulation, high-
velocity or low-amplitude thrust, or any other procedure intended to result in
joint cavitation. Joint manipulation commences where grades one through four
mobilization ends.
Sec. 8. Section 38-2511, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2511 Occupational therapy aide means a person who is not licensed by
the board and who provides supportive services to occupational therapists and
occupational therapy assistants and functions only under the guidance,
responsibility, and supervision of an occupational therapist or an occupational
therapy assistant. An aide shall not provide occupational therapy services and
shall demonstrate competence before performing assigned and delegated client-
related and non-client-related tasks. An aide includes a rehabilitation aide, a
rehabilitation technician, and other designations of nonlicensed, supportive
personnel.
Occupational therapy aide means a person who is not licensed under the
Occupational Therapy Practice Act and who provides supportive services to
occupational therapists and occupational therapy assistants.
Sec. 9. Section 38-2512, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2512 Occupational therapy assistant means a person licensed to assist
in the practice of occupational therapy under the Occupational Therapy Practice
Act and who works under the appropriate supervision of, and in collaboration
with, an occupational therapist. holding a current license to assist in the
practice of occupational therapy.
Sec. 10. Section 38-2513, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2513 Physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities means modalities
that produce a biophysiological response through the use of water, temperature,
sound, electricity, or mechanical devices.
Sec. 11. Section 38-2514, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2514 Superficial thermal agent modalities means hydrotherapy,
whirlpool, cryotherapy, fluidotherapy, hot packs, paraffin, water, infrared,
and other commercially available superficial heating and cooling technologies.
hot packs, cold packs, ice, fluidotherapy, paraffin, water, and other
commercially available superficial heating and cooling technologies.
Sec. 12. Section 38-2516, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2516 (1) No person may represent himself or herself to be a licensed
occupational therapist or occupational therapy assistant unless the person is
licensed in accordance with the Occupational Therapy Practice Act or has a
compact privilege to practice in accordance with the Occupational Therapy
Practice Interstate Compact.
(2) Nothing in the Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall be construed to
prevent:
(a) Any person licensed in this state pursuant to the Uniform
Credentialing Act from engaging in the profession or occupation for which he or
she is licensed;
(b) The activities and services of any person employed as an occupational
therapist or occupational therapy assistant who serves in the armed forces of
the United States or the United States Public Health Service or who is employed
by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or other federal agencies,
if their practice is limited to that service or employment;
(c) The activities and services of any person pursuing an accredited
course of study leading to a degree or certificate in occupational therapy if
-3-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
such activities and services constitute a part of a supervised course of study
and if such a person is designated by a title which clearly indicates his or
her status as a student or trainee;
(d) The activities and services of any person fulfilling the supervised
fieldwork experience requirements of section sections 38-2518 and 38-2519 if
such activities and services constitute a part of the experience necessary to
meet the requirements of such section sections; or
(e) A qualified member Qualified members of another profession other
professions or occupation occupations, including, but not limited to, a
recreation specialist specialists or therapist therapists, a special education
teacher teachers, an independent living specialist specialists, a work
adjustment trainer trainers, a caseworker, or a person caseworkers, and persons
pursuing a course courses of study leading to a degree or certification in such
fields, from doing work similar to occupational therapy which is consistent
with the member's their training if such member does they do not represent
himself or herself themselves by any title or description to be an occupational
therapist or occupational therapy assistant therapists.
Sec. 13. Section 38-2517, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2517 (1) A Any person who has applied to take the examination under
section 38-2518 or 38-2519 and who has completed the education and experience
requirements of the Occupational Therapy Practice Act may be granted a
temporary license to practice as an occupational therapist or an occupational
therapy assistant. A temporary license shall allow the person to practice only
in association with an a licensed occupational therapist. and shall be valid
until the date on which the results of the next licensure examination are
available to the department.
(2) A temporary license expires the earlier of: (a) The date the person
holding the temporary license is issued a permanent license; (b) the date the
board denies a person's license application; (c) one hundred eighty days after
the date the temporary license is issued; or (d) the date a person is notified
of a failure of the licensure examination. The temporary license shall not be
renewed if the applicant has failed the examination. The temporary license may
be extended by the department, with the recommendation of the board.
(3) In no case may a temporary license be extended for a period greater
than beyond one year after the date of issuance.
(4) (2) This section does not apply to a temporary license issued as
provided in section 38-129.01.
Sec. 14. Section 38-2518, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
38-2518 (1) An applicant applying for a license as an occupational
therapist shall show to the satisfaction of the department that the applicant
he or she:
(a) Has successfully completed the academic requirements of an educational
program in occupational therapy recognized by the department and accredited by
a nationally recognized accrediting body medical association or nationally
recognized occupational therapy association; and
(b) Has successfully completed a period of supervised fieldwork experience
at an educational institution approved by the department and where the
applicant's academic work was completed or which is part of a training program
approved by such educational institution. A minimum of six months of supervised
fieldwork experience shall be required for an occupational therapist; and
(b) (c) Has passed an examination as provided in section 38-2520.
(2) If In the case of an applicant who has been trained as an occupational
therapist in a foreign country, the applicant shall:
(a) Present documentation of completion of an educational program in
occupational therapy that is substantially equivalent to an approved program
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Occupational Therapy Education or
by an equivalent accrediting body agency as determined by the board;
(b) Present proof of proficiency in the English language; and
(c) Pass Have passed an examination as provided in section 38-2520.
(3) Residency in this state shall not be a requirement of licensure. A
corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or association shall not
be licensed as an occupational therapist pursuant to the Occupational Therapy
Practice Act.
Sec. 15. Section 38-2520, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2520 (1) Each applicant for licensure under pursuant to the
Occupational Therapy Practice Act shall take an be examined by a written
examination which tests the applicant's his or her knowledge of the basic and
clinical sciences relating to occupational therapy and occupational therapy
theory and practice including, but not limited to, professional skills and
judgment in the utilization of occupational therapy techniques and methods and
such other subjects as identified by the body administering the national
licensure examination. Each applicant shall follow the rules as outlined by
such body and meet the minimum requirements for the examination. Results of the
examination shall be sent to the board for verification of entry-level
competency. as the board may deem useful to determine the applicant's fitness
to practice. The board shall approve the examination and establish standards
for acceptable performance. The board may choose a nationally standardized
occupational therapist and occupational therapy assistant entry-level
examination.
(2) Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place and
-4-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
under such supervision as the board may determine.
Sec. 16. Section 38-2526, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2526 (1) An occupational therapist may perform any services identified
in section 38-2510 for which the occupational therapist is competent to perform
based on the occupational therapist's entry-level training or continued
professional development. An occupational therapist may pursue specialization,
training, or professional development in a specific modality, procedure, or
technique. It is the responsibility of the practitioner to be proficient and
document proficiency in the specific modality of practice.
(2) An occupational therapist is qualified to apply physical agent and
instrument-assisted modalities pursuant to subsection (1) of section 38-2530.
(3) An occupational therapist may complete insertion and removal of
cannulas for oxygen and adjustment of the rate of flow based on a physician
order.
(4) An occupational therapist shall not independently diagnose a medical
condition or disease.
An occupational therapist may perform the following services:
(1) Evaluate, develop, improve, sustain, or restore skills in activities
of daily living, work activities, or productive activities, including
instrumental activities of daily living, and play and leisure activities;
(2) Evaluate, develop, remediate, or restore sensorimotor, cognitive, or
psychosocial components of performance;
(3) Design, fabricate, apply, or train in the use of assistive technology
or orthotic devices and train in the use of prosthetic devices;
(4) Adapt environments and processes, including the application of
ergonomic principles, to enhance performance and safety in daily life roles;
(5) If certified pursuant to section 38-2530, apply physical agent
modalities as an adjunct to or in preparation for engagement in occupations
when applied by a practitioner who has documented evidence of possessing the
theoretical background and technical skills for safe and competent use;
(6) Evaluate and provide intervention in collaboration with the client,
family, caregiver, or others;
(7) Educate the client, family, caregiver, or others in carrying out
appropriate nonskilled interventions; and
(8) Consult with groups, programs, organizations, or communities to
provide population-based services.
Sec. 17. Section 38-2527, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2527 An occupational therapy assistant may deliver occupational therapy
services enumerated in section 38-2510 38-2526 in collaboration with and under
the supervision of an occupational therapist.
Sec. 18. Section 38-2530, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2530 (1) In order to apply physical agent modalities, an occupational
therapist shall be certified pursuant to this section.
(1)(a) If an occupational therapist's occupational therapy educational
program does not include education in superficial thermal, deep thermal,
electrotherapeutic, and mechanical devices or the occupational therapist is not
certified by the Hand Therapy Certification Commission or other equivalent body
recognized by the board, the occupational therapist shall request approval from
the board to practice physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities.
(b) An occupational therapist may perform dry needling only in accordance
with the level of education and training successfully completed. Education and
training shall be approved by the board and include clinical instruction and
application on the performance of dry needling.
(c) An occupational therapist may not use diathermy.
(2) The department shall issue a certificate to an occupational therapist
to administer a physical agent and instrument-assisted modality if the
occupational therapist:
(a) Has successfully completed a training course approved by the board and
passed an examination approved by the board on the physical agent and
instrument-assisted modality;
(b) Is certified as a hand therapist by the Hand Therapy Certification
Commission or other equivalent body recognized by the board;
(c) Has a minimum of five years of experience in the use of physical agent
and instrument-assisted modalities and has passed an examination approved by
the board on physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities; or
(d) Has completed education during a basic educational program which
included demonstration of competencies for application of physical agent and
instrument-assisted modalities.
(3) The department shall issue a certificate for an occupational therapist
to utilize dry needling if the occupational therapist has successfully
completed a board-approved training course to administer dry needling.
(4) An occupational therapist shall not delegate evaluation, reevaluation,
treatment planning, and treatment goals for physical agent and instrument-
assisted modalities to an occupational therapy assistant.
(5)(a) An occupational therapy assistant may administer a physical agent
modality if the occupational therapy assistant (i) has successfully completed a
training course approved by the board and passed an examination approved by the
board on the physical agent modality and (ii) is appropriately supervised by an
occupational therapist who is approved to administer physical agent modalities.
(b) An occupational therapy assistant shall not complete evaluation,
-5-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
reevaluation, treatment planning, or treatment goal setting related to physical
agent modality use.
(c) An occupational therapy assistant may not use the instrument-assisted
modality of dry needling or diathermy.
The department shall issue a certificate to an occupational therapist to
administer a physical agent modality if the occupational therapist:
(a) Has successfully completed a training course approved by the board and
passed an examination approved by the board on the physical agent modality;
(b) Is certified as a hand therapist by the Hand Therapy Certification
Commission or other equivalent entity recognized by the board;
(c) Has a minimum of five years of experience in the use of the physical
agent modality and has passed an examination approved by the board on the
physical agent modality; or
(d) Has completed education during a basic educational program which
included demonstration of competencies for application of the physical agent
modality.
(6) (2) The department shall issue a certificate to authorize an
occupational therapy assistant to set up and implement treatment using
superficial thermal agent modalities, deep thermal agent modalities,
electrotherapeutic modalities, and mechanical devices if the occupational
therapy assistant has successfully completed a training course approved by the
board and passed an examination approved by the board. Such set up and
implementation shall only be done under the onsite supervision of an
occupational therapist certified to administer such modalities superficial
thermal agent modalities.
(3) An occupational therapist shall not delegate evaluation, reevaluation,
treatment planning, and treatment goals for physical agent modalities to an
occupational therapy assistant.
Sec. 19. Section 38-2531, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
38-2531 (1) The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
regarding role delineation for occupational therapy assistants and continuing
competency requirements. Continuing education is sufficient to meet continuing
competency requirements. Such requirements may also include, but not be limited
to, one or more of the continuing competency activities listed in section
38-145 which a licensed person may select as an alternative to continuing
education.
(2) The board may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the
training courses for an occupational therapist to be certified to administer a
physical agent and instrument-assisted modalities modality. The board may adopt
and promulgate rules and regulations governing the training course for an
occupational therapy assistant to be certified to set up and implement
superficial thermal agent modalities. In adopting such rules and regulations,
the board shall give consideration to the levels of training and experience
which are required, in the opinion of the board, to protect the public health,
safety, and welfare and to insure, to the greatest extent possible, the
efficient, adequate, and safe practice of occupational therapy. Such rules and
regulations shall include the approval of examinations and the passing score
for such examinations for certification.
Sec. 20. Electromagnetic modality means the use of electromagnetic waves,
including radio waves, microwaves, and light waves, to transport electrical and
magnetic energy through space to effect changes in body structures.
Sec. 21. Instrument-assisted modality means the therapeutic use of an
instrument or tool that is manually applied by a trained practitioner to target
specific tissues including skin, fascia, and other connective tissues or
muscle.
Sec. 22. Mechanical modality means the therapeutic use of a mechanical
device to apply force, such as compression, distraction, vibration, or
controlled mobilization, to modify biomechanical properties and functions of
tissues.
Sec. 23. Supervision means a collaborative process for responsible,
periodic review and inspection of all aspects of occupational therapy services
where (1) the occupational therapist is responsible for occupational therapy
services provided by an occupational therapy assistant or an occupational
therapy aide, and (2) an occupational therapy assistant is responsible for the
occupational therapy services provided by the assistant. The goal of
supervision is to ensure the safe and effective delivery of occupational
therapy services.
Sec. 24. Section 71-1911.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-1911.03 (1) An applicant for a license under the Child Care Licensing
Act shall provide to the department written proof of liability insurance
coverage for the hours such applicant is operating and a child is in the
applicant's care of at least one hundred thousand dollars per occurrence prior
to issuance of the license. A licensee subject to the Child Care Licensing Act
on July 1, 2014, shall obtain such liability insurance coverage and provide
written proof to the department within thirty days after July 1, 2014.
(2) A licensee shall continue to maintain the required level of liability
insurance for any time period during which a child is in the care of such
licensee. Failure by a licensee to maintain the required level of liability
insurance coverage shall be deemed noncompliance with the Child Care Licensing
Act. If the licensee is the State of Nebraska or a political subdivision, the
licensee may utilize a risk retention group or a risk management pool for
-6-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
purposes of providing such liability insurance coverage or may self-insure all
or part of such coverage.
Sec. 25. Section 71-1912, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
71-1912 (1) Before issuance of a license, the department shall investigate
or cause an investigation to be made, when it deems necessary, to determine if
the applicant or person in charge of the program meets or is capable of meeting
the physical well-being, safety, and protection standards and the other rules
and regulations of the department adopted and promulgated under the Child Care
Licensing Act. The department may investigate the character of applicants and
licensees, any member of the applicant's or licensee's household, and the staff
and employees of programs. The department may at any time inspect or cause an
inspection to be made of any place where a program is operating to determine if
such program is being properly conducted.
(2) All inspections by the department shall be unannounced except for
initial licensure visits and consultation visits. Initial licensure visits are
announced visits necessary for a provisional license to be issued to a family
child care home I, family child care home II, child care center, or school-age-
only or preschool program. Consultation visits are announced visits made at the
request of a licensee for the purpose of consulting with a department
specialist on ways of improving the program.
(3) An unannounced inspection of any place where a program is operating
shall be conducted by the department or the city, village, or county pursuant
to subsection (2) of section 71-1914 at least annually for a program licensed
to provide child care for fewer than thirty children and at least twice every
year for a program licensed to provide child care for thirty or more children.
At each unannounced inspection, the inspector shall request from the licensee,
and verify, current proof of required liability insurance. If the licensee is
unable to provide current proof of liability insurance or has let the required
coverage lapse, the department shall notify the licensee that proof of
insurance shall be provided to the department within three business days. If
such proof of insurance is not provided to the department within three business
days, the licensee's license shall be suspended. Licensure shall be restored
upon the department's receipt and verification of current proof of the required
liability insurance as provided in section 71-1911.03.
(4) Whenever an inspection is made, the findings shall be recorded in a
report designated by the department. The public shall have access to the
results of these inspections upon a written or oral request to the department.
The request must include the name and address of the program. Additional
unannounced inspections shall be performed as often as is necessary for the
efficient and effective enforcement of the Child Care Licensing Act.
(5)(a) A person applying for a license as a child care provider or a
licensed child care provider under the Child Care Licensing Act shall submit a
request for a national criminal history record information check for each child
care staff member, including a prospective child care staff member of the child
care provider, at the applicant's or licensee's expense, as set forth in this
section.
(b) A prospective child care staff member shall submit to a national
criminal history record information check (i) prior to employment, except as
otherwise permitted under 45 C.F.R. 98.43, as such regulation existed on
January 1, 2019, or (ii) prior to residing in a family child care home.
(c) The department shall provide documentation of national criminal
history record information checks which proves eligibility for employment. Such
documentation shall be made available to each child care staff member or
prospective child care staff member by the applicant or licensee for at least
one hundred eighty days after the last day of employment or date the
documentation was provided by the department, whichever is later.
(d) A child care staff member shall be required to undergo a national
criminal history record information check not less than once during each five-
year period. A child care staff member shall submit a complete set of his or
her fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska State Patrol shall
transmit a copy of the child care staff member's fingerprints to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record information
check. The national criminal history record information check shall include
information concerning child care staff members from federal repositories of
such information and repositories of such information in other states, if
authorized by federal law for use by the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska
State Patrol shall issue a report to the department that includes the
information collected from the national criminal history record information
check concerning child care staff members. The department shall seek federal
funds, if available, to assist child care providers and child care staff
members with the costs of the fingerprinting and national criminal history
record information check. If the department does not receive sufficient federal
funds to assist child care providers and staff members with such costs, then
the child care staff member being screened, applicant for a license, or
licensee shall pay the actual cost of the fingerprinting and national criminal
history record information check, except that the department may pay all or
part of the cost if funding becomes available. The department and the Nebraska
State Patrol may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the
costs associated with the fingerprinting and the national criminal history
record information check. The department may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations implementing national criminal history record information check
requirements for child care providers and child care staff members.
-7-

LB257 LB257
2025 2025
(e) A child care staff member shall also submit to the following
background checks at his or her expense not less than once during each five-
year period:
(i) A search of the National Crime Information Center's National Sex
Offender Registry; and
(ii) A search of the following registries, repositories, or databases in
the state where the child care provider is located or where the child care
staff member resides and each state where the child care provider was located
or where the child care staff member resided during the preceding five years:
(A) State criminal registries or repositories;
(B) State sex offender registries or repositories; and
(C) State-based child abuse and neglect registries and databases.
(f) Background checks shall be portable between child care providers.
(g) Any individual shall be ineligible for employment by a child care
provider if such individual:
(i) Refuses to consent to the national criminal history record information
check or a background check described in this subsection;
(ii) Knowingly makes a materially false statement in connection with the
national criminal history record information check or a background check
described in this subsection;
(iii) Is registered, or required to be registered, on a state sex offender
registry or repository or the National Sex Offender Registry; or
(iv) Has been convicted of a crime of violence, a crime of moral
turpitude, or a crime of dishonesty.
(h) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for
purposes of this section.
(i) A child care provider shall be ineligible for a license under the
Child Care Licensing Act and shall be ineligible to participate in the child
care subsidy program if the provider employs a child care staff member who is
ineligible for employment under subdivisions (g) or (h) of this subsection.
(j) National criminal history record information and information from
background checks described in this subsection subject to state or federal
confidentiality requirements may only be used for purposes of granting a child
care license or approving a child care provider for participation in the child
care subsidy program.
(k) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Child care provider means a child care program required to be licensed
under the Child Care Licensing Act; and
(ii) Child care staff member means an individual who is not related to all
of the children for whom child care services are provided and:
(A) Who is employed by a child care provider for compensation, including
contract employees or self-employed individuals;
(B) Whose activities involve the care or supervision of children for a
child care provider or unsupervised access to children who are cared for or
supervised by a child care provider; or
(C) Who is residing in a family child care home and who is eighteen years
of age or older.
Sec. 26. Section 71-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
71-1913 (1) The department may request the State Fire Marshal to inspect
any program for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502. The State Fire Marshal
shall immediately notify the department whenever he or she delegates authority
for such inspections under such section.
(2) The department may investigate all facilities and programs of licensed
providers of child care programs as defined in section 71-1910 or applicants
for licenses to provide such programs to determine if the place or places to be
covered by such licenses meet standards of sanitation and physical well-being
set by the department for the care and protection of the child or children who
may be placed in such facilities and programs. The department may delegate this
authority to qualified local environmental health personnel.
(3) At each investigation, the inspector shall request from the licensee,
and verify, current proof of liability insurance pursuant to section
71-1911.03.
(4) (3) This section does not apply to school-age child care programs
which are licensed pursuant to section 71-1917.
Sec. 27. Original sections 38-2501, 38-2503, 38-2506, 38-2507, 38-2510,
38-2511, 38-2512, 38-2513, 38-2514, 38-2520, 38-2526, 38-2527, 38-2530,
38-2531, and 71-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
38-2125, 38-2130, 38-2516, 38-2517, 38-2518, 71-1911.03, and 71-1912, Revised
Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-